Massachusetts, session 194th, H1878.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The second paragraph of Section 17 of chapter 40A, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraphs:-
If the complaint is filed by someone other than the original applicant, appellant or
petitioner, such original applicant, appellant, or petitioner and all members of the board of
appeals or special permit granting authority shall be named as parties defendant with their
addresses. To avoid delay in the proceedings, instead of the usual service of process, the plaintiff
shall within fourteen days after the filing of the complaint, send written notice thereof, with a
copy of the complaint, by delivery or certified mail to all defendants, including the members of
the board of appeals or special permit granting authority and shall within twenty-one days after
of 3

the entry of the complaint file with the clerk of the court an affidavit that such notice has been
given. If no such affidavit is filed within such time the complaint shall be dismissed. No answer
shall be required but an answer may be filed and notice of such filing with a copy of the answer
and an affidavit of such notice given to all parties as provided above within seven days after the
filing of the answer. Other persons may be permitted to intervene, upon motion. The clerk of the
court shall give notice of the hearing as in other cases without jury, to all parties whether or not
they have appeared.
The board of appeals or special permit granting authority shall transmit to the reviewing
court the record of its proceedings, including its minutes, findings, decisions, and, if available, a
true and correct transcript of its proceedings. If the proceeding was tape recorded, a transcript of
that tape recording is a true and correct transcript for purposes of establishing the record. The
court may not accept or consider any evidence outside the record of the board of appeals or
special permit granting authority unless that evidence was offered to the board of appeals or
special permit granting authority, respectively, and the court determines that it was improperly
excluded from the record.
The court shall examine the record upon which the decision of the board of appeals or
special permit granting authority is based, and upon such record determine only whether or not
the decision is arbitrary, capricious, or illegal. A decision of a board of appeals or special permit
granting authority is valid if the decision is supported by substantial evidence in the record and is
not arbitrary, capricious, or illegal.
The foregoing remedy shall be exclusive, notwithstanding any defect of procedure or of
notice other than notice by publication, mailing or posting as required by this chapter, and the
of 3

validity of any action shall not be questioned for matters relating to defects in procedure or of
notice in any other proceedings except with respect to such publication, mailing or posting and
then only by a proceeding commenced within ninety days after the decision has been filed in the
office of the city or town clerk, but the parties shall have all rights of appeal and exception as in
other equity cases.
SECTION 2. Section 17 of chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
out the sixth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
A non-municipal plaintiff seeking to reverse approval of a project under this section shall
post a bond in an amount to be set by the court that is sufficient to cover twice the estimated: (1)
annual carrying costs of the property owner, or a person or entity carrying such costs on behalf of
the owner for the property, as may be established by affidavit; plus (2) an amount sufficient to
cover the defendants attorney’s fees, all of which shall be computed over the estimated period of
time during which the appeal is expected to delay the start of construction. The bond shall be
forfeited to the property owner in an amount sufficient to cover the property owner’s carrying
costs and legal fees less any net income received by the plaintiff from the property during the
pendency of the court case in the event a plaintiff does not substantially prevail on its appeal.
of 3